District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.154

Reporting requirements.

The Chief Financial Officer shall submit a written report to the Mayor and the Council on a quarterly basis on the status of the Fund, including the current balance of the Fund and a list of the projects supported by the Fund.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1264, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 8042(e), 62 DCR 10905

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1044 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1264 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1264 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(e) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation